Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20187-202
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that many attorneys graduate from law
school with substantial educational debt that prohibits many from considering
public legal service work or
work in less-populated rural areas of Nebraska. A need exists
for public legal service entities and
rural clients to hire competent attorneys. The public is better
served by competent and qualified attorneys working in the area of public
legal service and serving underserved
rural areas. Programs providing educational loan repayment
assistance will encourage law students and other attorneys to
seek employment in the area of public legal service and in designated legal profession shortage areas in rural
Nebraska and will enable public legal service entities and rural communities to attract
and retain qualified attorneys.

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 20;

Laws 2014, LB907, § 2.